Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7452
Bond or other security.

An applicant for an initial or renewal license as a wholesale drug distributor shall submit to the department proof of a bond of not less than one hundred thousand dollars or other equivalent means of security acceptable to the department. The bond or other security shall be given for the purpose of securing payment of any fines or other penalties imposed by the department and any fees or costs incurred by the department relating to such applicant as authorized under the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act or rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act which remain unpaid by the applicant within thirty days after such fines, penalties, and costs become final. The department may make a claim against such bond or security until one year after the expiration of the license issued to the applicant under the act.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 26.